Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 8. ACQUISITION, SALE, OR LEASE OF PROPERTY

SUBTITLE C. ACQUISITION, SALE, OR LEASE PROVISIONS APPLYING TO MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 280. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS AFFECTING ACQUISITION, SALE, OR LEASE OF PROPERTY BY MUNICIPALITIES AND COUNTIES

Sec. 280.001. LAND FOR USE OF UNITED STATES. (a) A municipality or county, separately or jointly, may acquire land for the use of the United States government, either by a lease for a term of years or in fee simple title.

(b) Land acquired under this section by a county must be located within the county. Land acquired under this section by a municipality must be located within the county in which the municipality is located.

(c) For the purpose of acquiring land under this section, a municipality or county may appropriate any available funds and issue time warrants in payment. If time warrants are issued, the provisions of Chapter 252 or Subchapter C of Chapter 262 shall be followed to the extent applicable.

(d) For the purpose of acquiring land under this section, a municipality or county may condemn land. The condemnation may be for any period of years or in fee simple title. Condemnation may be in the name of the municipality or county.

(e) Prior to the filing of a petition for condemnation, the commissioners court of the county or the governing body of the municipality shall estimate an amount of money to be the just compensation for the interest in the land taken, and the petition shall state that amount.

(f) Immediately after filing a condemnation suit, the municipality or county may take possession of the land by depositing with the county clerk the amount of money estimated. After a hearing as provided by law, if the special commissioners appointed under the condemnation statutes find the just compensation to be greater than the amount fixed by the commissioners court or governing body, an additional amount shall be deposited with the county clerk by the taking authority to equal the amount found by the special commissioners.

(g) After the date of the taking, which is the date of the deposit of the money estimated by the commissioners court or governing body or the date of deposit of the amount fixed by the special commissioners if the taking is not desired until after the special commissioners have acted, the municipality or county may transfer the interest acquired by the taking to the United States government.

(h) A municipality or county may contract with the United States government obligating itself to acquire a lease-hold interest or fee simple title in land as authorized by this section.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1064, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 280.002. ACQUISITION OF REAL PROPERTY PERMITTED IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (d), a local government may accept ownership of property located in the jurisdiction of the local government if:

(1) the property is properly conveyed as a gift by a grantor who acquired title to the property from a debtor in default;

(2) the grantor sent to the local government by registered mail a notice of the grantor's intent to convey the property to the local government; and

(3) the conveyance instrument grants to the local government unencumbered title to the property.

(b) The notice required by Subsection (a)(2) must be delivered to the county clerk of the county or the municipal clerk or secretary of the municipality in which the property is located. The county clerk or the municipal clerk or secretary shall place the notice of the intended conveyance on the agenda for a meeting of the governing body of the local government within 60 days. The grantor or the grantor's representative shall appear before the governing body of the local government at the meeting to answer any questions about the property. The local government shall accept or reject the proposed conveyance within 90 days of the meeting.

(c) A grantor may convey title to property to a local government under Subsection (a) immediately after the governing body of the local government approves the conveyance.

(d) A local government may not accept property conveyed under this section if:

(1) an unabated nuisance exists on the property; or

(2) ownership of the property will subject the local government to liability under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (42 U.S.C. Section 9601 et seq.), Chapter 361, Health and Safety Code, or Subchapter I, Chapter 26, Water Code.

(e) A local government that accepts property under this section may retain the property or dispose of the property by any method authorized by law.

(f) In this section, "local government" means a municipality or county.

(g) This section is cumulative of other statutory provisions relating to the same subject.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 775, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 280.003. HOSPITAL SITES IN COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY. (a) The commissioners court of a county or the governing body of a municipality may issue bonds that are payable from ad valorem taxes and use the proceeds from the sale of the bonds to acquire by purchase, condemnation, or both, land to be used for hospital purposes.

(b) A county or municipality that has sufficient money in its general fund may use money in that fund to acquire land to be used for hospital purposes.

(c) A county or municipality that owns land suitable for hospital purposes, including land acquired under Subsection (a) or (b), may donate the land to this state or to the United States for hospital purposes if this state or the United States agrees to erect and maintain a hospital on the land.

(d) A county or municipality may accept a nominal award as full compensation for land that is suitable for hospital purposes in a condemnation proceeding brought by this state or by the United States to acquire the land for hospital purposes.

(e) If bonds are issued under Subsection (a), the commissioners court or the governing body must impose the taxes in compliance with the applicable provisions of Subtitles A and C, Title 9, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 280.004. REGIONAL BUSINESS CERTIFICATION PROGRAMS. (a) Any combination of counties, municipalities, special districts, or other political subdivisions, by ordinance, resolution, rule, order, or other means, may agree to establish a regional business certification program to be used in connection with the political subdivisions' purchasing procedures.

(b) A consolidated entity administering a program established under this section may adopt rules, regulations, or other provisions that are designed to streamline and centralize the certification process of qualified businesses, including small and emerging businesses, and that allow businesses, as a result of being certified by the program, to participate in the contracting and procurement process of any member entity involved in the regional business certification program.

(c) The purpose of this section is to permit participating political subdivisions the greatest possible flexibility to organize a regional business certification program most suitable to address the region's problems related to business certification.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 986, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 280.003 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(86), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.